Utah statutes.
32A-1-123.   Licensee compliance with other laws.
(1)  Each applicant for a license and each licensee shall comply with all
applicable federal and state laws pertaining to payment of taxes and
contributions to unemployment and insurance funds to which it may be subject.
(2)  The commission:
(a)  may not issue a license to an applicant that violates this section; and
(b)  may suspend, revoke, or not renew the license of any licensee who fails
to comply with this section.
